Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 13. Reports and Records.

§ 13.1-1278.
Trust records.

A business trust shall keep minutes of all meetings of its beneficial owners and trustees, a record of all actions taken by the beneficial owners or trustees without a meeting, and a record of all actions taken by a committee of the trustees on behalf of the business trust.

A business trust shall maintain appropriate accounting records.

A business trust or its agent shall maintain a record of its beneficial owners, in a form that permits preparation of a list of the names and addresses of all beneficial owners, in alphabetical order by class and series, if any, of beneficial interests showing the number and class and series, if any, of beneficial interests held by each.

A business trust shall maintain its records in written form or in another form capable of conversion into written form within a reasonable time.

A business trust shall keep a copy of the following records:

Its articles or restated articles of trust and all amendments to them currently in effect;

Its governing instrument and all amendments to it currently in effect;

Resolutions adopted by its trustees creating one or more classes or series of beneficial interests, and fixing their relative rights, preferences, and limitations, if beneficial interests issued pursuant to those resolutions are outstanding;

The minutes of all meetings of beneficial owners, and records of all action taken by beneficial owners without a meeting, for the past three years;

All written communications to beneficial owners generally within the past three years; and

A list of the names and business addresses of its current trustees and officers.

History.

2002, c. 621.

Effective date.

This chapter became effective October 1, 2003.

§ 13.1-1279.
Inspection of records by beneficial owners.

Subject to subsection C of §

13.1-1280

, a beneficial owner of a business trust is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at the business trust’s principal office, any of the records of the business trust described in subsection E of §

13.1-1278

if he gives the business trust written notice of his demand at least five business days before the date on which he wishes to inspect and copy.

A beneficial owner of a business trust is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at a reasonable location specified by the business trust, any of the following records of the business trust if the beneficial owner meets the requirements of subsection C of this section and gives the business trust written notice of his demand at least five business days before the date on which he wishes to inspect and copy:

Excerpts from minutes of any meeting of the trustees, records of any action of a committee of the trustees while acting in or on behalf of the business trust, minutes of any meeting of the beneficial owners, and records of action taken by the beneficial owners or trustees without a meeting, to the extent not subject to inspection under subsection A of this section;

Accounting records of the business trust; and

The record of beneficial owners.

A beneficial owner may inspect and copy the records identified in subsection B of this section only if:

He has been a beneficial owner of record for at least six months immediately preceding his demand or is the holder of record of at least five percent of all of the outstanding beneficial interests;

His demand is made in good faith and for a proper purpose;

He describes with reasonable particularity his purpose and the records he desires to inspect; and

The records are directly connected with his purpose.

The right of inspection granted by this section may not be abolished or limited by a business trust’s articles of trust or governing instrument.

This section shall not affect:

The right of a beneficial owner to inspect records, if the beneficial owner is in litigation with the business trust, to the same extent as any other litigant; or

The power of a court, independently of this chapter, to compel the production of trust records for examination.

History.

2002, c. 621.

§ 13.1-1280.
Scope of inspection right.

A beneficial owner’s agent or attorney has the same inspection and copying rights as the beneficial owner he represents.

The right to copy records under §

13.1-1279

includes, if reasonable, the right to receive copies made by photographic or other means.

The business trust may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents provided to the beneficial owner. The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production or reproduction of the records.

The business trust may comply with a beneficial owner’s demand to inspect the record of beneficial owners under subdivision 3 of subsection B of §

13.1-1279

by providing him with a list of its beneficial owners that was compiled no earlier than the date of the beneficial owner’s demand.

History.

2002, c. 621.

§ 13.1-1281.
Court-ordered inspection.

If a business trust does not allow a beneficial owner who complies with subsection A of §

13.1-1279

to inspect and copy any records required by that subsection to be available for inspection, the circuit court in the city or county where the business trust’s principal office is located, or, if none in this Commonwealth, where its registered office is located, may summarily order inspection and copying of the records demanded at the business trust’s expense upon application of the beneficial owner.

If a business trust does not within a reasonable time allow a beneficial owner to inspect and copy any other record, the beneficial owner who complies with subsections B and C of §

13.1-1269

may apply to the circuit court in the city or county where the business trust’s principal office is located, or, if none in this Commonwealth, where its registered office is located, for an order to permit inspection and copying of the records demanded. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may also order the business trust to pay the beneficial owner’s costs, including reasonable counsel fees, incurred to obtain the order if the beneficial owner proves that the business trust refused inspection without a reasonable basis of doubt about the right of the beneficial owner to inspect the records demanded.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records by the demanding beneficial owner.

History.

2002, c. 621.